Arkansas, session 2025, HB1484.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 16, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-16-163. Course credit recovery program — Limitation on credits
obtained.
(a) Beginning with the entering ninth grade class of 2025-2026, a
student participating in a course credit recovery program in order to obtain
credit toward high school graduation requirements shall not obtain more than
ten (10) total credits in the course credit recovery program during grades
nine through twelve (9-12).
(b) However, this section shall not apply to a:
(1) Student with an individualized education program if the
student's individualized education program includes a course recovery
program;
(2) Student who is in foster care;
(3) Student who is in the custody of the Division of Youth
*TNL065*
04-09-2025 15:09:20 TNL065

As Engrossed: H2/26/25 H3/3/25 H3/4/25 H3/11/25 H3/12/25 S4/9/25 HB1484
Services;
(4) Student who is considered homeless under the McKinney-Vento
Homeless Assistance Act, 42 U.S.C. § 11431 et seq., as it existed on January
1, 2025;
(5) Student who is in long-term placement in a mental health
facility;
(6) Student who is in long-term placement in a medical hospital
due to unforeseen circumstances, including without limitation a medical
procedure or an accident;
(7) Student who is pregnant;
(8) Student who is determined to be high-risk or in need of Tier
III intensive intervention services according to the Division of Elementary
and Secondary Education Alternative Education Process Guide;
(9) Student who is enrolled full-time in a statewide open-
enrollment virtual charter school;
(10) Student who is being served or has been served in an
English as a Second Language program in grades nine through twelve (9-12); or
(11) Student who is enrolled in a credit recovery open-
enrollment public charter school.
(c) As used in this section, "long-term placement" means the placement
of a student in a mental health facility or medical hospital for prescribed
care that results in the student being absent from school for a cumulative
total of thirty (30) or more days during a single academic semester while the
student is enrolled in school and attempting to earn credit towards
graduation.

/s/Gramlich









04-09-2025 15:09:20 TNL065